District of Columbia statutes.
8-303

Prosecutions.

Prosecutions under §§ 8-301 to 8-303 shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, upon information filed by the Corporation Counsel for said District or 1 of his assistants.

Mar. 1, 1899, 30 Stat. 959, ch. 326, § 3
Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1340, ch. 854, § 932
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 537, ch. 1329
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
1981 Ed., § 6-1103.
1973 Ed., § 6-903.